Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB714.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5325.1. Sibling visitation rights.(a) Petition.--Upon the filing of a petition for visitation by a petitioner, or by a parent or legal guardian of a petitioner if the petitioner is not an adult and the parent or legal guardian is acting on behalf of the petitioner, the court may award reasonable visitation to the petitioner in accordance with this section.(b) Considerations.--In determining whether to award reasonable visitation to a petitioner, a court shall consider:(1) The best interests of the child in accordance with section 5328 (relating to factors to consider when awarding custody).12345678910111213141516171819 (2) Whether the petitioner is a fit and proper individual to have visitation with the child.(3) Whether the petitioner has attempted to visit or otherwise spend time with the child during the 30 days immediately preceding the filing of the petition but was not allowed to visit or otherwise spend time with the child during that period as a direct result of the actions of an individual with physical custody of the child.(4) Whether there is any other way for the petitioner to have visitation with the child without court intervention.(5) Whether the petitioner has shown by clear and convincing evidence that the refusal, by an individual with physical custody of the child, to permit the petitioner to have visitation with the child is unreasonable.(c) Construction.--This section shall not be construed to affect any rights regarding standing or the award of custody under this chapter.(d) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Petitioner." An individual who is a sibling of a child and who is seeking visitation with the child."Sibling." A brother, sister, half-brother, half-sister, stepbrother or stepsister."Visitation." As follows:(1) The right to visit or otherwise spend time with a child who is a sibling.(2) The term does not include the right to partial physical custody, primary physical custody, shared physical custody, sole physical custody or supervised physical 20250HB0714PN0733 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 custody.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0714PN0733 - 3 - 12